ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/eo-spell/src/eo.aff
flag *X:
    A        >	-A,-
    E        >	-E,-
    O        >	-O,-
    [^G] I   >	-I,-

    I G I	>	-GI,GxIS
    I G I	>	-GI,GxAS
    I G I	>	-GI,GxOS
    I G I	>	-GI,GxU
    I G I	>	-GI,GxUS

    I G I	>	-GI,GxADIS
    I G I	>	-GI,GxADAS
    I G I	>	-GI,GxADOS
    I G I	>	-GI,GxADU
    I G I	>	-GI,GxADUS

    I G I	>	-GI,GxINTA
    I G I	>	-GI,GxINTAJ
    I G I	>	-GI,GxINTAJN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxINTAN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxINTE
    I G I	>	-GI,GxINTO
    I G I	>	-GI,GxINTOJ
    I G I	>	-GI,GxINTOJN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxINTON
    I G I	>	-GI,GxANTA
    I G I	>	-GI,GxANTAJ
    I G I	>	-GI,GxANTAJN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxANTAN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxANTE
    I G I	>	-GI,GxANTO
    I G I	>	-GI,GxANTOJ
    I G I	>	-GI,GxANTOJN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxANTON
    I G I	>	-GI,GxONTA
    I G I	>	-GI,GxONTAJ
    I G I	>	-GI,GxONTAJN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxONTAN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxONTE
    I G I	>	-GI,GxONTO
    I G I	>	-GI,GxONTOJ
    I G I	>	-GI,GxONTOJN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxONTON
    I G I	>	-GI,GxO
    I G I	>	-GI,GxOJ
    I G I	>	-GI,GxOJN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxON
    I G I	>	-GI,GxI
    I G I	>	-GI,GxA
    I G I	>	-GI,GxAJ
    I G I	>	-GI,GxAJN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxAN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxE
    I G I	>	-GI,GxEMA
    I G I	>	-GI,GxEMAJ
    I G I	>	-GI,GxEMAJN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxEMAN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxEME 
    I G I	>	-GI,GxEMO 
    I G I	>	-GI,GxEMOJ
    I G I	>	-GI,GxEMOJN
    I G I	>	-GI,GxEMON

flag *Y:
    A			>	JxA
    A			>	JxAJ
    A			>	JxAJN
    A			>	JxAN
    A			>	Jx'
    A			>	JxO
    A			>	JxOJ
    A			>	JxOJN
    A			>	JxON
    I			>	-I,AJxA
    I			>	-I,AJxAJ
    I			>	-I,AJxAJN
    I			>	-I,AJxAN
    I			>	-I,AJx'
    I			>	-I,AJxO
    I			>	-I,AJxOJ
    I			>	-I,AJxOJN
    I			>	-I,AJxON
    O			>	-O,AJxA
    O			>	-O,AJxAJ
    O			>	-O,AJxAJN
    O			>	-O,AJxAN
    O			>	-O,AJx'
    O			>	-O,AJxO
    O			>	-O,AJxOJ
    O			>	-O,AJxOJN
    O			>	-O,AJxON

flag *Z:
    A			>	-A,ISM'
    A			>	-A,ISMA
    A			>	-A,ISMAJ
    A			>	-A,ISMAJN
    A			>	-A,ISMAN
    A			>	-A,ISME
    A			>	-A,ISMO
    A			>	-A,ISMOJ
    A			>	-A,ISMOJN
    A			>	-A,ISMON
    I			>	SM'
    I			>	SMA
    I			>	SMAJ
    I			>	SMAJN
    I			>	SMAN
    I			>	SME
    I			>	SMO
    I			>	SMOJ
    I			>	SMOJN
    I			>	SMON
    O			>	-O,ISM'
    O			>	-O,ISMA
    O			>	-O,ISMAJ
    O			>	-O,ISMAJN
    O			>	-O,ISMAN
    O			>	-O,ISME
    O			>	-O,ISMO
    O			>	-O,ISMOJ
    O			>	-O,ISMOJN
    O			>	-O,ISMON


# eo.aff finiøas æi tie.
